South Dakota, session 2026, HB1135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $101 from the general fund to the state, for the purpose of
enhancing the economic health of South Dakota.
Section 2. The state shall approve vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay
expenditures authorized by this Act.
Section 3. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 4. This Act is effective June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.